HunSpellDictionaries/uk_UA.dic
акомпанувати/AB
алкілувати/ABGH
анулювати/AB
атомізувати/ABGH
баламутитися/B
безславити/ABGH
блазнитися/B
борувати/ABGH
будитися/B
вакуумувати/ABGH
вбризкувати/AB
ввіткнути/AB
вгодувати/AB
вдоїти/AB
вередитися/B
взяти/AB
вибруднити/AB
вивищити/AB
вив'ялити/AB
виговорити/ABEF
вигострити/AB
видерти/AB
видумуватися/B
визолочувати/AB
викип'ятити/AB
виколупувати/ABGH
викресати/AB
викручувати/ABGH
виліковувати/AB
вилущувати/AB
вимішувати/AB
винагороджувати/ABGH
випарувати/AB
випліскувати/ABGHOP
випорювати/AB
випростувати/AB
вирізати/ABIJGH
вирятовувати/AB
висидіти/AB
вислужувати/AB
висотувати/AB
вистругувати/AB
витворити/AB
витоптувати/AB
витхнути/ABEF
вихлюпнути/AB
вицідити/AB
вичорнити/AB
вищирити/AB
відбуксируватися/B
відвойовувати/ABGH
відгодовувати/AB
віддихнути/AB
відзначувати/AB
відкашлювати/AB
відкрасуватися/B
відліплюватися/B
відмінитися/B
відплутувати/AB
відригуватися/B
відспівувати/AB
відфільтрувати/AB
відшліхтовувати/AB
вкочуватися/B
внормувати/AB
вписувати/AB
врятувати/AB
втихомирити/ABCD
вхоплювати/AB
гарячкуватися/B
гнути/ABEFGH
гранити/ABGH
дебатувати/AB
демонструвати/ABGH
димити/AB
добруковуватися/B
догоїти/AB
докликатися/B
домацуватися/B
доорюватися/B
дораховуватися/B
досмолюватися/B
дотулитися/B
дриґнути/ABEF
емансипуватися/B
заарештувати/AB
забілити/AB
завалити/ABEF
заволожити/AB
загвинтити/ABEF
загоріти/AB
задимити/AB
зазнайомити/AB
заквітчуватися/B
законтрактовуватися/B
закруглити/ABEF
залігувати/AB
замаринувати/AB
замолити/AB
занижувати/AB
запаркувати/AB
заплішувати/AB
запрацювати/AB
зареєструвати/AB
засекречувати/AB
засмердітися/B
застидити/AB
затанцювати/AB
заторгувати/AB
зафіксовуватися/B
зацькувати/AB
зашпилювати/AB
збентежити/ABCD
звезти/AB
згасити/ABEF
здвоюватися/B
зекономити/ABCD
злетіти/AB
змилити/AB
зм'якшити/AB
знервуватися/B
зобов'язати/AB
зроджувати/AB
зчіплювати/AB
іннервувати/ABGH
каламутити/ABCD
кільцюватися/B
колотити/AB
конфісковувати/ABGH
красуватися/BH
куштувати/AB
ліквідувати/AB
макетувати/AB
мережити/AB
моделювати/AB
набавити/ABCD
навірчувати/AB
нагостритися/B
надрубувати/AB
накільчуватися/B
наламувати/AB
намолочувати/AB
наплювати/AB
нарізувати/AB
наснажити/AB
натискувати/AB
нахмурити/ABCD
недогартувати/AB
нетямитися/B
обварити/ABEF
обдумувати/AB
облагороджувати/AB
обмежити/ABCD
обпалювати/AB
обсапувати/ABGH
обтягувати/AB
одімкнути/AB
озирнутися/BF
окутувати/AB
опорожнювати/ABGH
освинцьовувати/AB
осміхнутися/BF
отруювати/AB
ощаджуватися/B
пеленгувати/AB
перевибрати/AB
перегодовувати/AB
пережовувати/AB
переколоти/AB
переломити/AB
перемочити/AB
переоформити/ABEF
перепрацюватися/B
пересадити/ABEF
перестрахувати/AB
переупаковуватися/B
персоніфікувати/AB
підгодувати/AB
підкорити/ABEF
підмазати/AB
підписати/AB
підсіктися/B
підтягнути/ABEF
плеснути/AB
повалити/ABEF
повозити/AB
погребти/AB
поженити/ABEF
позастраховувати/AB
показувати/ABGH
покурювати/AB
помазати/AB
понавішувати/AB
поносити/ABEF
поперемінювати/AB
попримощувати/AB
порозкутувати/AB
посипати/ABIJ
постерегти/AB
потоншувати/AB
похитнути/ABEF
пощаститися/B
приварити/AB
пригостити/ABEF
приклеїти/ABCD
примазувати/AB
припалювати/AB
прирощувати/AB
пристроювати/AB
притягнути/ABEF
прищепити/ABEF
проговорювати/AB
прожарюватися/B
проконспектувати/AB
промочуватися/B
прорахувати/AB
просмикнутися/B
протегувати/AB
процідити/ABEF
радикалізувати/AB
режисерувати/ABGH
ринути/ABCD
розбудитися/B
розгалужуватися/B
роздвоювати/AB
роззброїти/ABCD
розкорчовуватися/B
розліплювати/AB
розморити/AB
розперізувати/AB
розповсюдити/AB
розрізнювати/AB
розстикуватися/B
розтулити/ABEF
розчепірювати/AB
роз'ятрюватися/B
самоліквідуватися/B
святити/ABEFGH
скаламутити/ABCD
сколювати/ABGH
скошувати/AB
славити/ABCD
спарити/AB
сплатитися/B
сполячувати/AB
спролетаризуватися/B
створювати/ABGH
стратитися/B
стягнути/ABEF
схематизувати/ABGH
творити/ABEFGH
токувати/AB
трафаретити/ABGH
тяжитися/B
увозитися/B
удушити/AB
укорочувати/AB
уміщувати/AB
уперезати/AB
уразити/AB
усікти/AB
утверджувати/ABGH
утуплювати/AB
фабрикувати/AB
фрахтувати/AB
цензурувати/ABGHOP
чесати/ABGH
шкодувати/ABGH
юстувати/AB
